Louisiana, session 2026, HB421.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IV of Chapter 9 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:971 through 980, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV. AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEMS AND EMPLOYMENT
§971. Definitions
For purposes of this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system
that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives,
infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical
or virtual environments.
Page 1 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(2) "Authorized representative" means any person or organization appointed
by the worker to serve as an agent of the worker. Authorized representative does not
include a worker's employer.
(3) "Automated decision system" or "ADS" means any computational
process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or
artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including a score, classification,
or recommendation, that is used to assist or replace human discretionary
decisionmaking and materially impacts by a natural person. An automated decision
system does not include a spam email filter, firewall, antivirus software, identity and
access management tools, calculator, database, data set, or other compilation of data.
(4) "ADS output" means any information, data, assumptions, predictions,
scoring, recommendations, decisions, or conclusions generated by an ADS.
(5)(a) "Employer" means any person who directly or indirectly, or through
an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, benefits,
other compensation, hours, working conditions, access to work or job opportunities,
or other terms or conditions of employment of any worker. This also includes all
branches of state government, parishes, cities, and municipalities, or any other
political subdivision of the state, school district, special district, or any authority,
commission, or board, or any other agency or instrumentality thereof.
(b) "Employer" also includes a labor contractor of an employer as defined
in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(6)(a) "Employment-related decision" means any decision by an employer
that impacts wages, wage setting, benefits, compensation, work hours, work
schedule, performance evaluation, hiring, recruitment, discipline, promotion,
termination, job tasks, skill requirements, work responsibilities, assignment of work,
access to work and training opportunities, productivity requirements, workplace
health and safety, and any other terms or conditions of employment.
(b) For an individual classified as an independent contractor or a candidate
for employment, employment-related decision means the equivalent of the decisions
Page 2 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
provided for in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph based on his contract with or his
relationship to the employer.
(7)(a) "Essential job functions" means the fundamental duties of a position
as revealed by all of the following objective evidence:
(i) The amount of time workers spend performing each function.
(ii) The consequences of not requiring individuals to perform the function.
(iii) The terms of any applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(iv) The workers' past and present work experiences and performance in the
position in question.
(v) The employer's reasonable, non-discriminatory judgment as to which
functions are essential.
(b) Essential job functions may include past and current written job
descriptions and the employer's reasonable, non-discriminatory judgment as to which
functions are essential for achieving the purpose of the job. However, such functions
shall not be the sole basis for this determination absent the objective evidence
described in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(8) "Federal government" means a department, agency, or instrumentality,
corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.
(9) "Individualized" means a specific individual or group, band, class, or tier
of individuals with particular personal characteristics, behavior, or biometrics.
(10) "Other information" means, without limitation, any of the following:
(a) Supervisory or managerial evaluations.
(b) Personnel files.
(c) Work product of workers.
(d) Peer reviews.
(e) Relevant online customer reviews.
(11) "Quota" means a work standard under which an employee is assigned
or required to perform at a specified productivity speed, to perform a quantified
number of tasks, or to handle or produce a quantified amount of material, within a
Page 3 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
defined time period and under which the employee may suffer an adverse
employment action if they fail to complete the performance standard.
(12) "Worker" means any natural person who is an employee of, job
applicant for, or an independent contractor providing service to, or through, a
business or a state or local governmental entity in any workplace.
(13) "Worker data" means any information that identifies, relates to, or
describes a worker, regardless of how the information is collected, inferred, or
obtained.
(14) "Vendor" means a third party, subcontractor, or entity engaged by an
employer or an employer's labor contractor that provides software, technology, or a
related service that is used to collect, store, analyze, or interpret worker data or
worker information.
§972. Automated Decision System pre-use notice requirement
A. An employer shall provide written notice that an ADS, for the purpose of
making employment-related decisions, not including hiring, is in use at the
workplace to a worker who will foreseeably be directly affected by the ADS, or his
authorized representative. The notice shall be provided at any of the following time
periods:
(1) At least thirty days before an ADS is first deployed by the employer.
(2) If the employer is using an ADS to assist in making employment-related
decisions at the time this Part takes effect.
(3) To a new worker within thirty days of his hiring date.
B. An employer shall maintain an updated list of all ADS currently in use.
C. A written notice required by this Section shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Written in plain language as a separate, standalone communication.
(2) In the language in which routine communications and other information
are provided to workers.
Page 4 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(3) Provided via a simple and easy-to-use method, including but not limited
to an email, hyperlink, or other written format.
D. An employer who uses an ADS to make hiring decisions shall notify a job
applicant upon receiving his application that the employer utilizes an ADS for hiring
decisions. Notifications may be made using an automatic reply mechanism or on the
job posting.
E. A notice issued pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall contain all
of the following information:
(1) The type of employment-related decisions potentially affected by the
ADS.
(2) A general description of the categories of worker input data the ADS will
use, the sources of worker input data, and how worker input data will be collected.
(3) Any key parameters known to disproportionately affect the output of the
ADS.
(4) The individuals, vendors, or entities that created the ADS.
(5) If applicable, a description of each quota set or measure by an ADS that
the worker is subject to, including the quantified number of tasks to be performed or
products to be produced, and any potential adverse employment action that could
result from failure to meet the quota, as well as whether those quotas are subject to
change and if any notice is given of changes in quotas.
(6) A description of the worker's right to access and correct the worker's own
data used by the ADS.
(7) That the employer shall be prohibited from retaliating against a worker
who exercises his rights as provided in Paragraph (6) of this Subsection.
(8) That the worker has a right to appeal any decision made with the
assistance of an ADS and the process to appeal that decision.
§973. Usage of automated decision systems
A.(1) An employer shall not use an ADS to do any of the following:
Page 5 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(a) Prevent compliance with or violate any federal, state, or local labor,
occupational health and safety, employment, or civil rights laws or regulations.
(b) Infer a worker's protected status as provided for in R.S. 23:332.
(c) Identify, profile, predict, or take adverse action against a worker for
exercising his legal rights, including but not limited to rights guaranteed by state and
federal employment and labor law.
(d) Make predictions or inferences about a worker's behavior, beliefs,
intentions, personality, emotional state, health, or other characteristics or behavior
that are unrelated to the worker's essential job functions.
(2) In addition to the prohibitions provided for in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, an employer shall not use an ADS that utilizes facial recognition, gait,
or emotion recognition technologies.
B. An employer shall not use an ADS to collect worker data for a purpose
that is not disclosed pursuant to the notice requirements as provided in R.S. 23:972.
C.(1) An employer shall not rely solely on an ADS when making a
discipline, termination, or deactivation decision.
(2) If an employer or a vendor utilizes an ADS output to assist in making an
employment-related decision, the employer or vendor shall do all of the following:
(a) Ensure the accuracy of the ADS output.
(b)(i) Use a designated internal reviewer to conduct a separate investigation
and compile corroborating information for the decision. This information may
include but is not limited to supervisory or managerial evaluations, personnel files,
employee work products, or peer reviews.
(ii) The designated internal reviewer required by this Subparagraph shall
have all of the following:
(aa) Sufficient authority, discretion, resources, and time to corroborate the
ADS output.
Page 6 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(bb) Sufficient expertise in the operation of similar systems and a sufficient
understanding of the ADS in question to interpret its outputs as well as results of
relevant impact assessments.
(cc) Education, training, or experience sufficient to allow the reviewer to
make a well-informed decision.
(iii) The designated internal reviewer shall be protected from retaliation for
exercising his responsibilities.
(3) An employer shall not rely on an ADS to make an employment-related
decision if the employer cannot corroborate the ADS output or the human reviewer
has concluded that the ADS output is inaccurate, incomplete, or misleading.
(4)(a) An employer shall allow a worker to access worker data collected,
used by, or produced by an ADS and correct errors in any input or output data used
by or produced by the ADS or used as corroborating evidence by a human reviewer.
(b) An affected worker shall be allowed to choose an authorized
representative to request access to the worker's data on his behalf.
D. An employer shall not use an ADS that utilizes or relies on individualized
worker data as inputs or outputs to determine or inform compensation, unless the
employer can demonstrate all of the following:
(1) The input data is directly related to the ability of the worker to complete
the task based on his education, training, experience, or seniority.
(2) The inputs used are clearly communicated to the worker such that the
worker knows his compensation is a function of the identified attributes.
(3) He does not use the ADS more than once per a six-month period per
worker.
(4) He does not use the ADS for the purpose of hiring, promoting, or any
other meaningful changes in work duties.
E. An employer shall not use customer ratings as the only or primary input
data for an ADS to make employment-related decisions.
Page 7 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
F. A worker has the right to request, and an employer shall provide, a copy
of the most recent twelve months of the worker's own data primarily used by an ADS
to make a discipline, termination, or deactivation decision. A worker shall be limited
to one request every twelve months for a copy of his own data used by an ADS to
make a discipline, termination, or deactivation decision.
G. For purposes of safeguarding the privacy rights of consumers, workers,
and individuals, when an employer is required to provide worker data pursuant to
this Part, the worker data shall be provided in a manner that provides anonymity
regarding the customer's, other worker's, or individual's personal information.
§974. Automated decision system post-use notice requirement
A. An employer that primarily relies on an ADS to make a discipline,
termination, or deactivation decision shall provide the affected worker with written
notice at the time such decision is made. The notice shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Written in plain language as a separate, standalone communication.
(2) In the language in which routine communications and other information
are provided to workers.
(3) Provided via a simple and easy-to-use method, including but not limited
to an email, hyperlink, or other written format.
B. A notice issued pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall contain all
of the following information:
(1) The human individual to contact for more information about the decision
and the ability to request a copy of the worker's own worker data relied on in the
decision.
(2) That the employer used an ADS to assist the employer in any discipline,
termination, or deactivation decisions with respect to the worker.
(3) That the worker has the right to request a copy of the worker's data used
by the ADS.
Page 8 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(4) That the employer is prohibited from retaliating against the worker for
exercising his right pursuant to this Part.
(5) The worker's right to appeal the decision as provided in R.S. 23:975.
§975. Right to appeal
A. If an employer has used an ADS to make an employment-related decision
about a worker, the affected worker has the right to appeal that decision, request a
human review, request submission of additional information, and correct any errors
in the data used by the ADS.
B. An employer or a vendor that used an ADS to make an employment-
related decision shall provide an affected worker with a form or a hyperlink to an
electronic form that provides that the worker has a right to appeal the decision within
thirty days from the date that the worker was notified. The appeal form provided to
an affected worker shall include all of the following:
(1) The option to request access to the data used as input to or as output from
the ADS.
(2) The option to request access to any corroborating or supporting evidence
provided by a human reviewer to verify output from the ADS.
(3) The worker's reason or justification for an appeal and any evidence to
support the appeal.
(4) A designation for an authorized representative who can also access the
data.
C.(1) An employer or a vendor shall respond to an appeal within fourteen
business days.
(2)(a)(i) In responding to an appeal, the employer or vendor shall designate
a human reviewer who shall meet all of the following requirements:
(aa) He can objectively evaluate all evidence.
(bb) He has sufficient authority, discretion, and resources to evaluate the
decision.
(cc) He has the authority to overturn the decision.
Page 9 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
(ii) The employer or vendor shall not designate a person who was involved
in the decision that the worker is appealing.
(b) The response provided to the worker shall be composed on a clear,
written document which describes the result of the appeal and the reasons for that
result.
(3) If the human reviewer determines that the employment-related decision
should be overturned, the employer or vendor shall rectify the decision within
twenty-one business days.
§976. Complying with notice requirements
An employer who complies with the notice requirements as required by this
Part shall not be required to comply with any substantially similar notice provisions
related to automated decisions systems used for employment-related decisions
required by any other state law.
§976.1. Complying with regulatory or contractual obligations
Nothing in this Part shall prohibit an employer from complying with
regulatory or contractual requirements concerning products or services for the
federal government.
§977. Retaliatory actions; prohibition
An employer shall not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, or
discriminate or retaliate, in any manner, against any worker for using or attempting
to exercise his rights pursuant to this Part, filing a complaint with Louisiana Works
alleging a violation of this Part, cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an
alleged violation of this Part, or any action taken by the worker to invoke or assist
in any manner for the enforcement of this Part, or for exercising or attempting to
exercise any right protected pursuant to this Part.
§978. Collective bargaining; applicability
The provisions of this Part shall not apply to parties covered by a collective
bargaining agreement if the agreement explicitly waives the provisions of this Part
in clear and unambiguous terms, expressly provides for the wages or earnings,
Page 10 of 15
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-638 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 421
working conditions, and other terms and conditions of work, and provides protection
from algorithmic management.
§979. Worker protections
Nothing in this Part shall preempt any city or parish ordinance that provides
equal or greater protection to workers who are covered pursuant to this Part.
§980. Enforcement; penalties
A. An employer who violates the provisions of this Part shall be subject to
a civil penalty of five hundred dollars.
B. Louisiana Works shall enforce the provisions of this Part, including
investigating an alleged violation, issuing a citation against an employer, and
ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate a violation or maintain the status
quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing.
C. A civil action brought pursuant to this Part shall be brought in the judicial
district court in the parish where the violation occurred, employee resides, or
employer is located. The petitioner may seek appropriate temporary or preliminary
injunctive relief, including punitive damages, and reasonable attorney fees and costs.
D. Louisiana Works may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary for the implementation of the
provisions of this Part.